Utah statutes.
11-42-302.   Contracts for work in an assessment area -- Sources of payment
-- Payments as work progresses.
(1)  A contract for work in an assessment area or for the purchase of property
required to make an improvement in an assessment area may require the contract
obligation to be paid from proceeds from the sale of assessment bonds, interim
warrants, or bond anticipation notes.
(2) (a)  To the extent that a contract is not paid from the sources stated in
Subsection (1), the local entity shall advance funds to pay the contract
obligation from other legally available money, according to the requirements
of the contract.
(b)  A local entity may reimburse itself for an amount paid from its general
fund or other funds under Subsection (2)(a) from:
(i)  the proceeds from the sale of assessment bonds, interim warrants, or bond
anticipation notes; or
(ii)  assessments or improvement revenues that are not pledged for the payment
of assessment bonds, interim warrants, or bond anticipation notes.
(c)  A local entity may not reimburse itself for costs of making an
improvement that are properly chargeable to the local entity or for which an
assessment may not be levied.
(3) (a)  A contract for work in an assessment area may provide for payments to
the contractor as the work progresses.
(b)  If a contract provides for periodic payments:
(i)  periodic payments may not exceed 90% of the value of the work done to the
date of the payment, as determined by estimates of the project engineer; and
(ii)  a final payment may be made only after the contractor has completed the
work and the local entity has accepted the work.
(c)  If a local entity retains money payable to a contractor as the work
progresses, the local entity shall retain or withhold and release the money as
provided in Section 13-8-5.
